Utah statutes.
63G-6a-609.   Multiple stage bidding process.

(1)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority may conduct a bid in multiple stages, to:

(a)  narrow the number of bidders who will progress to a subsequent stage;

(b)  prequalify bidders for subsequent stages, in accordance with Section 63G-6a-403;

(c)  enter into a contract for a single procurement; or

(d)  award multiple contracts for a series of upcoming procurements.

(2)  The invitation for bids for a multiple stage bidding process shall:

(a)  describe the requirements for, and purpose of, each stage of the process;

(b)  indicate whether the procurement unit intends to award:

(i)  a single contract; or

(ii)  multiple contracts for a series of upcoming procurements; and

(c)  state that:

(i)  the first stage is for prequalification only;

(ii)  a bidder may not submit any pricing information in the first stage of the process; and

(iii)  bids in the second stage will only be accepted from a person who prequalifies in the first stage.

(3)  During the first stage, the procurement unit:

(a)  shall prequalify bidders to participate in subsequent stages, in accordance with Section 63G-6a-403;

(b)  shall prohibit the submission of pricing information until the final stage; and

(c)  may, before beginning the second stage, request additional information to clarify the qualifications of the bidders who submit timely responses.

(4)  Contracts may only be awarded for a procurement item described in stage one of the invitation for bids.

(5)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority may conduct a bid in as many stages as it determines to be appropriate.

(6)  Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority shall conduct a multiple stage process in accordance with this part.

(7)  The applicable rulemaking authority may make rules governing the use of a multiple stage process described in this section.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

